Utah statutes.
72-4-104.   Disposition of portion of highways realigned.

(1)  The department may make changes in the alignment of state highways to provide for greater highway safety or more economical highway operation and maintenance.

(2)  When a state highway is realigned, the former portion of it may be:

(a)  returned or relinquished to the county or municipality in which it is situated to be maintained as a highway; or

(b)  abandoned by the department if it no longer serves the purpose of a highway.

